Tennessee, session 114, SB0966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-34-605(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(c) A member or retired member who performed peacetime military service in
the armed forces of the United States at any time on or after October 15, 1940, is
entitled to establish retirement credit for that military service under the following
conditions:
(1) Creditable service must be calculated on the basis of one (1) day of
creditable service for each day of military service rendered. To establish such
military service, the member must pay employee contributions for the service
claimed based on a contribution rate of nine percent (9%). The rate shall be
applied to the member's earnable compensation at the time of the claim or, if not
in service at the time of the claim, the member's earnable compensation at
termination of employment; and
(2) The member is subject to the conditions set forth in subdivisions
(b)(1)(A)-(C).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0966
000893
- 1 -